Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5259.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-10 of the General Laws entitled "Operators’ and Chauffeurs’
Licenses" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-10-3.1. Prohibition of suspension of driving privileges.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of the general laws, no court may suspend any
person’s operators’ or chauffers’ license for the failure or inability to pay costs for any traffic
offense or the costs of any other judicial proceeding. If the person has pleaded guilty or been found
guilty of a traffic or other offense and the court finds, after a hearing, that the person does not have
the ability to pay the costs associated with those court proceedings, the court may order the offender
to perform community service in lieu of costs, or may order the offender to pay the costs in
installments according to a schedule set by the court.
(b) No court, department, division or any agency of this state may suspend any person’s
operators’ or chauffers’ license or registration of any vehicle for the failure or inability of said
person to pay any child support payments, tax payments, court costs or any other fees, tolls, or
financial obligations owing the state.
(c) A person’s operators’ or chauffers’ license shall only be subject to suspension for
convictions of driving offenses including, but not limited to, §§ 31-27-2 through 31-27-2.8 and
other moving violations as provided by law.
SECTION 2. Section 15-11.1-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 15-11.1 entitled "Full

Enforcement of Support Obligations" is hereby repealed.
15-11.1-7. Suspension by board — Notice from board.
(a) Upon receipt of the certification of noncompliance from the department issued in
accordance with § 15-11.1-6, a board shall suspend the obligor’s license and refuse to issue or
reissue a license until the obligor provides the board with a release from the department that states
the obligor is in compliance with the obligor’s support order. When an obligor who is served notice
under § 15-11.1-3 subsequently complies with the court order of support, the department shall
within five (5) business days after compliance provide the obligor with written confirmation and a
release that the obligor is in compliance with the order. A suspension by a board or a refusal by a
board to reissue, renew, or otherwise extend the license or certificate of authority shall be deemed
a final determination for the purposes of chapter 35 of title 42.
(b) A board shall notify an obligor certified by the department under § 15-11.1-6, without
undue delay, that the obligor’s application for the issuance or renewal of a license may not be
granted or that the obligor’s license has been suspended because the obligor’s name has been
certified by the department as a support obligor who is not in compliance with a court order of
support.
(c) Within five (5) business days of receiving written confirmation that the obligor is in
compliance with the court order of support, the board shall reinstate, reissue, renew or otherwise
extend the obligor’s license or certificate of authority.
[See § 12-1-15 of the General Laws.]
SECTION 3. Section 21-28-4.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28 entitled "Uniform
Controlled Substances Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-28-4.01. Prohibited acts A — Penalties.
(a)(1) Except as authorized by this chapter and chapters 28.6 and 28.11 of title 21, it shall
be unlawful for any person to manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver
a controlled substance.
(2) Any person who is not a drug-addicted person, as defined in § 21-28-1.02, who violates
this subsection with respect to a controlled substance classified in schedule I or II, except the
substance classified as marijuana, is guilty of a crime and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned to
a term up to life or fined not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) nor less than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.
(3) Where the deliverance as prohibited in this subsection shall be the proximate cause of
death to the person to whom the controlled substance is delivered, it shall not be a defense that the
person delivering the substance was, at the time of delivery, a drug-addicted person as defined in §
LC000457 - Page 2 of 14

21-28-1.02.
(4) Any person, except as provided for in subsection (a)(2), who violates this subsection
with respect to:
(i) A controlled substance, classified in schedule I or II, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) years, or fined not more than one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) nor less than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both;
(ii) A controlled substance, classified in schedule III or IV, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years, or fined not more than forty
thousand dollars ($40,000), or both; provided, with respect to a controlled substance classified in
schedule III(d), upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not
more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.
(iii) A controlled substance, classified in schedule V, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000), or both.
(b)(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to create, deliver,
or possess with intent to deliver, a counterfeit substance.
(2) Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:
(i) A counterfeit substance, classified in schedule I or II, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) years, or fined not more than one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or both;
(ii) A counterfeit substance, classified in schedule III or IV, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years, or fined not more than forty
thousand dollars ($40,000), or both; provided, with respect to a controlled substance classified in
schedule III(d), upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not
more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.
(iii) A counterfeit substance, classified in schedule V, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000), or both.
(c)(1) It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess a controlled
substance, unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or
order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as
otherwise authorized by this chapter or chapters 28.6 and 28.11 of title 21.
(2) Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:
(i) Except as otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, ten grams (10 g.) or
LC000457 - Page 3 of 14

less of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of a controlled substance classified
in schedules I, II, III, IV, and V, except buprenorphine and the substance classified as marijuana,
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than two (2)
years, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or both.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, more than ten grams
(10 g.), but less than one ounce (1 oz.) of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
a controlled substance classified in schedules I, II and III, IV, and V, except buprenorphine and the
substance classified as marijuana, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned
for not more than three (3) years, or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(iii) Except as otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, more than two
ounces (2 oz.) or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate of a controlled
substance classified in schedule I as marijuana is guilty of a misdemeanor unless possessed inside
one’s own primary residence, except for those persons subject to (a)(1), and, upon conviction, may
be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or
both. Exclusive of live marijuana plants, more than ten ounces (10 oz.) of a controlled substance
classified in schedule I as marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate,
when possessed within one’s personal residence is guilty of a misdemeanor, except for those
persons subject to (a)(1), and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year, or
fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.
Possession of live marijuana plants in excess of the number authorized pursuant to § 21-
28.11-22 but less than twenty-five (25) marijuana plants is guilty of a misdemeanor, except for
those persons subject to (a)(1) and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year,
or fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or
both.
Possession of twenty-five (25) or more live marijuana plants is guilty of a felony, except
for those persons subject to (a)(1), and upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than three
(3) years or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(iv) Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, and except as
otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, the possession of more than one ounce (1
oz.) but not more than two ounces (2 oz.) of marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of
cannabis concentrate by a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years old, and who is not exempted
from penalties pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title, shall constitute a civil offense, rendering the
offender liable to a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and forfeiture of
the marijuana, but not to any other form of criminal or civil punishment or disqualification.
LC000457 - Page 4 of 14

Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, this civil penalty of one hundred
fifty dollars ($150) and forfeiture of the marijuana shall apply if the offense is the first (1st) or
second (2nd) violation within the previous eighteen (18) months.
(v) Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, possession of two
ounces (2 oz.) or less of marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate by
a person between seventeen (17) and twenty (20) years old, and who is not exempted from penalties
pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title, shall constitute a civil offense, rendering the offender liable to
a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and forfeiture of the marijuana;
provided the minor offender completes an approved, drug-awareness program and community
service as determined by the court. If the person seventeen (17) years of age or older and under the
age of eighteen (18) years fails to complete an approved, drug-awareness program and community
service within one year of the disposition, the penalty shall be a three hundred dollar ($300) civil
fine and forfeiture of the marijuana, except that if no drug-awareness program or community
service is available, the penalty shall be a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and forfeiture of
the marijuana. The parents or legal guardian of any offender seventeen (17) years of age or older
and under the age of eighteen (18) shall be notified of the offense and the availability of a drug-
awareness and community-service program. The drug-awareness program must be approved by the
court, but shall, at a minimum, provide four (4) hours of instruction or group discussion and ten
(10) hours of community service. Notwithstanding any other public, special, or general law to the
contrary, this civil penalty shall apply if the offense is the first or second violation within the
previous eighteen (18) months.
(vi) [Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 10 and P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 10.]
(vii) Any unpaid civil fine issued under (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) shall double to three hundred
dollars ($300) if not paid within thirty (30) days of the disposition. The civil fine shall double again
to six hundred dollars ($600) if it has not been paid within ninety (90) days.
(viii) No person may be arrested for a violation of (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) of this subsection
except as provided in this subparagraph. Any person in possession of an identification card, license,
or other form of identification issued by the state or any state, city, or town, or any college or
university, who fails to produce the same upon request of a police officer who informs the person
that he or she has been found in possession of what appears to the officer to be more than one ounce
(1 oz.) of marijuana, or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate or any person
without any such forms of identification who fails or refuses to truthfully provide his or her name,
address, and date of birth to a police officer who has informed such person that the officer intends
to provide such individual with a citation for possession of more than one ounce (1 oz.) but less
LC000457 - Page 5 of 14

than two ounces (2 oz.) of marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate,
may be arrested.
(ix) No violation of (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) of this subsection shall be considered a violation
of parole or probation.
(x) Any records collected by any state agency, tribunal, or the family court that include
personally identifiable information about violations of (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) shall not be open to
public inspection in accordance with § 8-8.2-21.
(3) Jurisdiction.
(i) Any and all adjudications of violations of (c)(2)(i) shall be within the original
jurisdiction of the Rhode Island superior court. The department of attorney general shall prosecute
any and all violations of (c)(2)(i).
(ii) Any and all violations of (c)(2)(iv) and (c)(2)(v) shall be the exclusive jurisdiction of
the Rhode Island traffic tribunal. All money associated with the civil fine issued under (c)(2)(iv) or
(c)(2)(v) shall be payable to the Rhode Island traffic tribunal. Fifty percent (50%) of all fines
collected by the Rhode Island traffic tribunal from civil penalties issued pursuant to (c)(2)(iv) or
(c)(2)(v) shall be expended on drug-awareness and treatment programs for youth.
(4) Additionally, every person convicted or who pleads nolo contendere under (c)(2)(i) or
(c)(2)(ii) or convicted or who pleads nolo contendere a second or subsequent time under (c)(2)(iii),
who is not sentenced to a term of imprisonment to serve for the offense, shall be required to:
(i) Perform up to one hundred (100) hours of community service;
(ii) Attend and complete a drug-counseling and education program, as prescribed, by the
director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals
(BHDDH) similar to that in § 21-28.11-27.2, and pay the sum of four hundred dollars ($400) to
help defray the costs of this program which shall be deposited as general revenues. Failure to attend
may result, after hearing by the court, in jail sentence up to one year;
(iii) The court shall not suspend any part or all of the imposition of the fee required by this
subsection, unless the court finds an inability to pay;.
(iv) If the offense involves the use of any automobile to transport the substance or the
substance is found within an automobile, then a person convicted or who pleads nolo contendere
under (c)(2)(i), (c)(2)(ii) or (c)(2)(iii) shall be subject to a loss of license for a period of six (6)
months for a first offense and one year for each offense after.
(5) All fees assessed and collected pursuant to (c)(2)(iii) shall be deposited as general
revenues and shall be collected from the person convicted or who pleads nolo contendere before
any other fines authorized by this chapter.
LC000457 - Page 6 of 14

(d) It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
manufacture or distribute, an imitation controlled substance. Any person who violates this
subsection is guilty of a crime and, upon conviction, shall be subject to the same term of
imprisonment and/or fine as provided by this chapter for the manufacture or distribution of the
controlled substance that the particular imitation controlled substance forming the basis of the
prosecution was designed to resemble and/or represented to be; but in no case shall the
imprisonment be for more than five (5) years nor the fine for more than twenty thousand dollars
($20,000).
(e) It shall be unlawful for a practitioner to prescribe, order, distribute, supply, or sell an
anabolic steroid or human growth hormone for: (1) Enhancing performance in an exercise, sport,
or game, or (2) Hormonal manipulation intended to increase muscle mass, strength, or weight
without a medical necessity. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor
and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or a fine of not more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
(f) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly or intentionally possess, manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to manufacture or distribute, any extract, compound, salt
derivative, or mixture of salvia divinorum or datura stramonium or its extracts unless the person is
exempt pursuant to the provisions of § 21-28-3.30. Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, any
person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be
imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or
both. The provisions of this section shall not apply to licensed physicians, pharmacists, and
accredited hospitals and teaching facilities engaged in the research or study of salvia divinorum or
datura stramonium and shall not apply to any person participating in clinical trials involving the
use of salvia divinorum or datura stramonium.
SECTION 4. Sections 31-3-6, 31-3-6.1, 31-3-6.1.1, 31-3-6.2 and 31-3-6.3 of the General
Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration of Vehicles" are hereby repealed.
31-3-6. List of vehicles on which taxes delinquent — Denial of registration.
(a) On or before October 31 in each year, the collector of taxes of each city or town shall
furnish the division of motor vehicles, with a listing showing the registration plate numbers, names,
and addresses of the taxpayers of the city or town whose personal property and/or excise tax on
motor vehicles, the assessment of which were made the prior December 31 in the case of the
property tax, and the tax levied in the current year in the case of the excise tax, remained unpaid as
of the date of the list. Subsequently, the collector of taxes in each city or town shall, at the times
and in the manner prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, furnish to the
LC000457 - Page 7 of 14

division of motor vehicles the names and addresses of those persons whose names appeared on that
list who have subsequently paid the personal property, and/or excise taxes on motor vehicles, and
the division shall remove from the list the names and addresses of those persons. No city or town
treasurer or tax collector shall refuse to accept personal property, and/or excise taxes on a motor
vehicle, or refuse to remove the names and addresses of the owners of the vehicle from the list
because of any other taxes owing the city or town. No person, corporation, partnership, joint stock
company, or association whose name appears on the list and whose name has not been subsequently
removed from the list shall be permitted to register any motor vehicle until all the excise and
attendant penalties have been paid in full and the payment has been certified to the division of
motor vehicles by the tax collector. The provisions of this section shall not be construed so as to
prevent the payment of taxes on motor vehicles in quarterly installments as provided in chapter 5
of title 44. The provisions of this section shall apply in all respects in the case of taxes assessed
upon motor vehicles by any fire district.
(b) The division of motor vehicles (the “division”) shall provide a written notice to those
persons or other taxpayers (the “person”) whose name appears on the list generated in accordance
with the provisions of subsection (a). This notice shall include:
(1) The name of the municipality or other entity providing the person’s name to the
division; and
(2) A statement that the person identified on the list shall not be permitted to register any
motor vehicle until the tax matter has been resolved and the person’s name is removed from the list
as provided for under subsection (a).
31-3-6.1. List of vehicles and licenses on which taxes delinquent — Denial of renewal
of registration and licenses.
(a) The administrator/division of motor vehicles shall furnish to the Tax Administrator a
listing showing the names, addresses and social security numbers of persons whose operator’s
license and/or motor vehicle registration is subject to renewal within ninety (90) days. If within
ninety (90) days prior to the renewal date the tax administrator determines that any person seeking
to renew his/her operator’s license and/or registration has neglected or refused to file any tax returns
or to pay any tax administered by the tax administrator and that such tax matter is not pending
administrative or appellate review, the tax administrator shall send a written notice to such person
informing him/her of the tax administrator’s intention to inform the division of motor vehicles not
to renew the person’s operator license and/or motor vehicle registration and of the procedures
available to the person to contest that determination.
(b) Within twenty-one (21) days from the date of such notice, the licensee or registrant may
LC000457 - Page 8 of 14

request, in writing, a conference with the tax administrator or his/her designee, in order to show
proof of payment of all taxes or for the purpose of entering into a time payment agreement for the
delinquent taxes satisfactory to the tax administrator.
(c) If upon the expiration of twenty-one (21) days from the date of the notice to the licensee
or registrant or, if a conference has been requested, after a conference has been held, the licensee
or registrant has not demonstrated to the satisfaction of the tax administrator that he/she has filed
all required returns and paid all required taxes, or that the licensee or registrant has not entered into
time payment arrangement satisfactory to the tax administrator, the tax administrator shall notify
the administrator/division of motor vehicles that the licensee or registrant is delinquent in filing tax
returns and/or remitting taxes due. The tax administrator shall send a copy of the notification to the
licensee or registrant.
(d) The administrator/division of motor vehicles shall not renew any operator’s license or
registration upon expiration thereof until all state taxes, interest and attendant penalties have been
paid in full or the licensee or registrant has entered into a time payment agreement satisfactory to
the tax administrator.
(e) If the licensee thereafter files an overdue return and/or remits past taxes due or enters
into a satisfactory time payment agreement with respect to any and all returns due and taxes
payable, the tax administrator shall, within five (5) business days of a licensee’s request, provide
the appropriate agency or authority the certificate of good standing specified in § 5-76-5. Within
five (5) business days of receiving such a certificate, the agency or authority shall reinstate, reissue,
renew or otherwise extend the licensee’s license.
(f) Payment of tax not an admission. If the licensee or registrant files an overdue return
and/or remits past due taxes in order to apply for or renew a license or registration, said late filing
and/or payment shall not be an admission of a violation of any criminal tax statute regarding late
filing and/or late payment. The tax administrator shall not refer such person to the Attorney General
for prosecution based solely upon said late filing and/or payment of past due taxes.
31-3-6.1.1. Denial of registration — Denial of transfer of registration — Failure to file
tax returns and/or pay taxes.
(a) On or before October 31 in each year and at least quarterly thereafter, the tax
administrator shall furnish the division of motor vehicles, with a list of the names, addresses and
social security numbers of persons who have neglected or refused to file a tax return(s) and/or to
pay any tax administered by the tax administrator and that there is no administrative or appellate
review pending regarding such tax matter.
(b) Thereafter, the tax administrator, at the times and in the manner mutually agreed to by
LC000457 - Page 9 of 14

the tax administrator and the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, shall furnish to the
division of motor vehicles the names, addresses and social security numbers of those persons whose
names appear on that list but who have subsequently filed all required returns and paid all required
taxes, interest and attendant penalties in full or entered into a time payment agreement satisfactory
to the tax administrator. Upon receipt of said information, said names, addresses and social security
numbers of said persons shall be removed from the list.
(c) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall not register any motor vehicle
or transfer the registration of any motor vehicle for any person whose name appears on a list
provided by the tax administrator pursuant to subsection (a) above until all state taxes, interest and
attendant penalties have been paid in full and the payment has been certified to the division of
motor vehicles by the tax administrator.
(d) If the person thereafter files an overdue return and/or remits past taxes due or enters
into a satisfactory time payment agreement with respect to any and all returns due and taxes
payable, the tax administrator shall, within five (5) business days of the person’s request, provide
the division of motor vehicles with a certificate of good standing specified in § 5-76-5. Within five
(5) business days of receiving such a certificate, the division of motor vehicles shall register or
transfer the person’s registration.
(e) If a person files an overdue return and/or remits past due taxes in order to register a
motor vehicle or transfer the registration of a motor vehicle, said late filing and/or payment shall
not be an admission of a violation of any criminal tax statute regarding late filing and/or late
payment. The tax administrator shall not refer such person to the attorney general for prosecution
based solely upon said late filing and/or payment of past due taxes.
31-3-6.2. List of vehicles and licenses on which court costs owed delinquent — Denial
of renewal of registration and licenses.
(a) The administrator/division of motor vehicles shall furnish to the State Court
Administrator a listing showing the names, addresses and social security numbers of persons whose
operator’s license and/or motor vehicle registration is subject to renewal within ninety (90) days.
If within ninety (90) days prior to the renewal date the state court administrator determines that any
person seeking to renew his/her operator’s license and/or registration has neglected or refused to
pay any cash assistance benefit overpayments, court costs owed, fines owed, obligations owed or
restitution owed, as such terms are defined in § 44-30.1-1, the state court administrator shall send
a written notice to such person informing him/her of the state court administrator’s intention to
inform the division of motor vehicles not to renew the person’s operator license and/or motor
vehicle registration and of the procedures available to the person to contest the determination. For
LC000457 - Page 10 of 14

the purposes of this section, the terms cash assistance benefit overpayments, court costs owed, fines
owed, obligations owed or restitution owed by a debtor as defined in § 44-30.1-1, are referred to as
“costs owed”.
(b) Within twenty-one (21) days from the date of such notice, the licensee or registrant may
request, in writing, a conference with the state court administrator or his/her designee, in order to
show proof of payment of all costs owed or for the purpose of entering into a time payment
agreement for the delinquent costs owed satisfactory to the state court administrator.
(c) If upon the expiration of twenty-one (21) days from the date of the notice to the licensee
or registrant or, if a conference has been requested, after a conference has been held, the licensee
or registrant has not demonstrated to the satisfaction of the state court administrator that he/she has
paid all required costs owed or that the licensee or registrant has not entered into time payment
arrangement satisfactory to the state court administrator, the state court administrator shall notify
the administrator/division of motor vehicles that the licensee or registrant is delinquent in paying
costs owed. The state court administrator shall send a copy of the notification to the licensee or
registrant.
(d) The administrator/division of motor vehicles shall not renew any operator’s license or
registration upon expiration thereof until all costs owed have been paid in full or the licensee or
registrant has entered into a time payment agreement satisfactory to the state court administrator.
(e) If the licensee thereafter files an overdue return and/or remits past taxes due or enters
into a satisfactory time payment agreement with respect to any and all returns due and taxes
payable, the tax administrator shall, within five (5) business days of a licensee’s request, provide
the appropriate agency or authority the certificate of good standing specified in § 5-76-5. Within
five (5) business days of receiving such a certificate, the agency or authority shall reinstate, reissue,
renew or otherwise extend the licensee’s license.
31-3-6.3. Unpaid out-of-state toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines — Denial of
registration — Denial of transfer of registration — Denial of renewal of registration and
licenses.
(a) Upon receipt of a request from another state or other entity with similar tolling authority
with which the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority has entered into an agreement providing
for the reciprocal treatment of out-of-state toll violators to take action against a toll violator, the
Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall conduct an independent review of each toll
violation that forms the basis for such request, which shall include a review of photographic, video,
or other visual evidence, to determine that the requesting state or other entity with similar tolling
authority imposed any toll amounts, administrative fees, and/or fines against the actual registered
LC000457 - Page 11 of 14

owner of the motor vehicle.
(b) As part of its independent review, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall
provide written notice to the registered owner of the motor vehicle in question. The registered
owner shall have ten (10) days from the date on the written notice to contact the Rhode Island
turnpike and bridge authority and to provide information, documentation, and any other evidence
contesting the requested action against the out-of-state toll violator. Thereafter, the Rhode Island
turnpike and bridge authority shall consider all of the information, documentation, and any other
evidence provided as part of its independent review.
(c) If after its independent review the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority is
satisfied that any toll amounts, administrative fees, and/or fines are properly imposed against the
actual registered owner of the motor vehicle and the registered owner could be subject to reporting
to the division of motor vehicles pursuant to § 24-12-37 if such toll violations had occurred on
tolled projects in this state, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority may report the registered
owner to the division of motor vehicles.
(d) The division of motor vehicles shall not renew any operator’s license or registration
upon expiration thereof; register any motor vehicle; or transfer the registration of any motor vehicle
of any person reported to it pursuant to subsection (c) of this section until any toll amounts,
administrative fees, and/or fines owed to the other state or other entity with similar tolling authority
have been paid in full or the person has entered into, and is in current compliance with, a repayment
agreement with respect to any amounts owed. The Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall
provide a copy of any notification received from the other state or other entity with similar tolling
authority regarding full payment of amounts owed or the existence of a repayment agreement to
the division of motor vehicles within five (5) business days of receipt. Within five (5) business days
of receiving such notification, the division of motor vehicles shall renew the person’s license and
renew, transfer, or issue the person’s registration.
SECTION 5. Section 31-10-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-10 entitled "Operators’
and Chauffeurs’ Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-10-3. Persons ineligible for licenses.
(a) The division of motor vehicles shall not issue any license under this chapter:
(1) To any person, as an operator, who is under the age of sixteen (16) years;
(2) To any person, as a chauffeur, who is under the age of eighteen (18) years;
(3) To any person, as an operator or chauffeur, whose license has been suspended, during
that suspension, nor to any person whose license has been revoked, except as provided in § 31-11-
10;
LC000457 - Page 12 of 14

(4) To any person, as an operator or chauffeur, who is a habitual drunkard or habitual user
of drugs to such an extent that he or she is incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle;
(5) To any person, as an operator or chauffeur, who is required by this chapter to take an
examination unless that person shall have successfully passed that examination;
(6) To any person who is required under the laws of this state to deposit proof of financial
responsibility and who has not deposited that proof;
(7) To any person when the administrator of the division of motor vehicles has good cause
based on clear and convincing evidence to believe that that person does not meet a standard of
physical or mental fitness for motor vehicle licensure established pursuant to § 31-10-44(b) and
that the person’s physical or mental condition prevents him or her from being able to operate a
motor vehicle with safety upon the highway;
(8) To any person when the administrator of the division of motor vehicles has good cause
to believe that the operation of a motor vehicle on the highways by that person would pose an
imminent safety risk to the general public as determined by objectively ascertainable standards;.
(9) To any person who is subject to an order issued pursuant to § 14-1-67.
(b) The division of motor vehicles shall notify in writing any person whose application for
a license has been denied pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. The notice shall contain the
factual and legal basis for the denial, the procedure for requesting a hearing, and the rights afforded
the individual pursuant to the provisions of § 31-11-7(d) — (f). When physical or mental fitness is
the basis for the denial, the notice shall reference the specific functional standard promulgated
pursuant to § 31-10-44(b), which was relied upon by the division of motor vehicles. Upon his or
her request the division of motor vehicles shall afford the license applicant an opportunity for a
hearing as early as practical and no later than twenty (20) days after receipt of the request.
(c) The hearing procedures afforded the applicant shall conform to the provisions of § 31-
11-7(d) — (f).
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000457
========
LC000457 - Page 13 of 14